Hawaii statutes.
[§329E-1] Definitions. The
following definitions apply throughout this chapter:

"Harm reduction organization" means
an organization that provides services, including medical care, counseling,
homeless services, or addiction treatment, to individuals at risk of
experiencing an opioid-related drug overdose event or to the friends and family
members of an at-risk individual.

"Health care professional" means a
physician licensed under chapter 453, physician assistant under the authority
and supervision of a physician, or advanced practice registered nurse with
prescriptive authority licensed under chapter 457.

"Opioid antagonist" means any drug
that binds to opioid receptors and blocks or disinhibits the effects of opioids
acting on those receptors, and that is approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for treating opioid-related drug overdose.

"Opioid-related drug overdose" means
a condition including but not limited to extreme physical illness, decreased
level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, or death resulting from
the consumption or use of an opioid, or another substance with which an opioid
was combined, or a condition that a layperson would reasonably believe to be an
opioid-related drug overdose that requires medical assistance.

"Pharmacist" means a registered
pharmacist as defined in chapter 461.

"Standing order" means a prescription
order for an opioid antagonist issued by a health care professional who is
otherwise authorized to prescribe an opioid antagonist that is not specific to
and does not identify a particular patient and which may be applicable to more
than one patient. [L 2016, c 68, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next